Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-517
School districts and educational service units; Nebraska Budget Act applicable.

The annual budget of all school districts and educational service units shall be subject to the Nebraska Budget Act.

Laws 1967, c. 509, § 1, p. 1711;

Laws 1971, LB 292, § 19;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 79-548;

Laws 1987, LB 127, § 2;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 196;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 167;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 79-547.03;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 42.

Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.